District of Columbia statutes.
26-1335

Compliance required of foreign corporations or companies.

No corporation or company organized by virtue of the laws of any of the states of this Union shall carry on in the District of Columbia any of the kinds of business named in this chapter without strict compliance in all particulars with the provisions of this chapter for the government of such corporations formed under it, and each one of the officers of the corporation or company so offending shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year, or by both fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1309, ch. 854, § 747
Mar. 4, 1933, 47 Stat. 1567, ch. 274, § 5
1981 Ed., § 26-435.
1973 Ed., § 26-335.